Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 8
LONG-TERM RENTALS AND LEASEHOLDS

31-15-801. Agreements - ordinance - financing.

In order to provide necessary land, buildings, equipment, and other property for governmental or proprietary purposes or for financing of forest health projects, as defined in section 37-95-103 (4.9), any municipality is authorized to enter into long-term rental or leasehold agreements, but in no event shall this be construed as authorizing the use by any municipality of leasehold agreements to finance residential housing. Such agreements may include an option to purchase and acquire title to such leased or rented property within a period not exceeding the useful life of such property and in no case exceeding thirty years. Each such agreement and the terms thereof shall be concluded by an ordinance duly enacted by the municipality. No such ordinance shall take effect before thirty days after its passage and publication. The governing body of any municipality is authorized to provide for the payment of said rentals from a general levy imposed upon both personal and real property included within the boundaries of the municipality; by imposing rates, tolls, and service charges for the use of such property or any part thereof by others; from any other available municipal income; or from any one or more of the said sources. The obligation to pay such rentals shall not constitute an indebtedness of said municipality within the meaning of the constitutional limitations on contracting of indebtedness by municipalities.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1122, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (HB 21-1008), ch. 159, p. 906, § 4, effective May 20.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-12-501 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-15-802. Tax exemption.

Property acquired or occupied pursuant to this part 8 shall be exempt from taxation so long as used for authorized governmental or proprietary functions of municipalities.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1122, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-12-502 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-15-803. Enforceability.

Purchase or leasehold agreements entered into by any municipality pursuant to this part 8 shall be enforceable in any court of competent jurisdiction.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1122, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-12-503 as it existed prior to 1975.